Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 941, as
amended by Section 226, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 941), is amended to read as follows:
Section 941. A. Except as provided in the Oklahoma Charity
Games Act or as otherwise authorized to be conducted on Indian lands
in compliance with the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, Section 2701,
HB4130 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

et s eq., of Title 25 of the United States Code, every person who
opens, or causes to be opened, or who conducts, whether for hire or
not, or carries on either poker, roulette, craps or any banking or
percentage, or any gambling game played with dice, cards or any
device, including, but not limited to, online casino games, for
money, checks, credits, or any representatives of value, or who
either as owner or employee, geolocation provider, gaming supplier,
platform provider, promoter, or media affiliate, whether for hire or
not, deals or provides support for those engaged in any such game,
shall be guilty of a Class C2 felony offense, and upon conviction
thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00), nor more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00),
and by imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through F of
Section 20M of this title.
B. For purposes of this section:
1. "Online casino games" means any gambling game that allows a
person to access the Internet, World Wide Web, or any part thereof
by way of any computer, computer system, computer network, computer
software, computer terminal, or similar device including, but not
limited to, a cellular or mobile telephone, a smart or electronic
watch, or a tablet which, upon risking any representatives of value,
simulates any gambling game contemplated in this section or any
other form of gambling including, but not limited to, a slot machine
as defined in Section 964 of this title, a lottery as defined in
HB4130 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

subs ection A of Section 1051 of this title, a bingo game or U-PIK-EM
bingo game as defined in subsections 1 and 22 of Section 402 of
Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes, and any prohibited game as
contemplated in subsection H of Section 262 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes; and
2. "Representatives of value" means any and all currency used
as part of a dual-currency system of payment allowing a person to
exchange such currency for any prize, award, cash, or cash
equivalent, or any chance to win any prize, award, cash, or cash
equivalent.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY AND PUBLIC SAFETY
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.











HB4130 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.